Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3969.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 509, as last
amended by Section 2, Chapter 467, O.S.L. 2025 (57 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 509), is amended to read as follows:
Section 509. A. The Department of Corrections is authorized to
maintain the following facilities in this state:
1. Oklahoma State Penitentiary in McAlester;
2. Oklahoma State Reformatory in Granite;
3. Lexington Assessment and Reception Center in Lexington;
4. Jackie Brannon Correctional Center in McAlester;
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3969 Page 1

5. Joseph Harp Correctional Center in Lexington;
6. Howard McLeod Correctional Center in Atoka;
7. Mack H. Alford Correctional Center in Stringtown;
8. Jim E. Hamilton Correctional Center in Hodgen;
9. Mabel Bassett Correctional Center in McLoud;
10. R.B. "Dick" Conner Correctional Center in Hominy;
11. James Crabtree Correctional Center in Helena;
12. Jess Dunn Correctional Center in Taft;
13. Northeast Oklahoma Community Corrections Center in Vinita;
14. John Lilley Correctional Center in Boley;
15. Dr. Eddie Warrior Correctional Center in Taft;
16. Clara Waters Community Corrections Center in Oklahoma City;
17. Lawton Community Corrections Center in Lawton;
18. Enid Community Corrections Center in Enid;
19. Union City Community Corrections Center in Union City;
20. Charles E. "Bill" Johnson Correctional Center in Alva; and
21. A facility purchased pursuant to the provisions of Enrolled
House Bill No. 2780 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature Chief James Smith Correctional Center in Lawton.
B. The Department shall be the legal successor of and, except
as otherwise provided in the Oklahoma Corrections Act of 1967, shall
have the powers and duties vested by law in the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services in all matters relating to penal
institutions, heretofore or hereafter established by the Department,
ENGR. H. B. NO. 3969 Page 2

whic h institutions and community corrections centers shall be under
the administrative direction and control of the Department.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate













ENGR. H. B. NO. 3969 Page 3